Massachusetts, session 194th, S2821.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, are hereby 
amended by inserting after chapter 93L the following chap  
CHAPTER 93M. Protection and Privacy of Social Care Information 
SECTION 2. Definitions 
“Closed-Loop Referral System” or “CLRS” means any system that stores the social care 
information of one or more individuals; enables the sharing of social care information with and 
between participating entities for the purpose of referring individuals for social care; and is 
capable of updating or showing updated referral activity, including data related to participating 
organizations completing referrals 
“Participating organization” means any entity that has the ability to create, receive, or 
update referrals, or other social care information in a CLRS, including, but not limited to, 

of 3 12 healthcare providers, health plans, public agencies, charitable and nonprofit organizations, CLRS 
technology vendors, and entities that provide social care. 
“Social care” means care, services, goods, or supplies related to an individual’s social 
needs. “Social care” includes, but is not limited to, support and assistance for an individual’s 
food stability and nutritional needs, housing, transportation, economic stability, employment, 
education access and quality, child care and family relationship needs, and environmental and 
physical safety. 
“Social care information” means any information that relates to the need for, payment 
for, or provision of social care, and identifies the person receiving social care, or for which there 
is a reasonable basis to believe the information can be used to identify the individual receiving 
social care. 
SECTION 3. 
(a) In a manner that is consistent with federal and State law, a participating organization 
shall not sell or license social care information that is stored in or transmitted through a closed-
loop referral system. 
(b) In a manner that is consistent with federal and State law, social care information 
stored in or transmitted through a closed-loop referral system shall not be used for any purpose 
other than the purpose for which that information was collected or generated unless the reason 
for sharing such information is disclosed in writing to the person receiving social care and is 
approved by said person. 

of 3 32  (c) A participating organization that sells, offers for sale, licenses, or otherwise furnishes, 
provides, or transmits to any other individual or entity social care information in violation of this 
section shall be liable to a civil penalty of $1,000 for each violation. 
(d) A civil penalty assessed pursuant to this section shall be collected and enforced by the 
attorney general.  
SECTION 4. Implementation 
The attorney general may adopt, amend, or repeal rules and regulations as shall be 
necessary for the implementation, administration, and enforcement of this chapter. SECTION 5. 
Effective Date 
This act shall take effect 90 days following the date of enactment.